Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-623
Dangerous dogs;
violation; conviction; effect.

(1) Any owner convicted of a violation of sections 54-617
to 54-624 shall not own a dangerous dog within ten years after such conviction.
Any owner violating this subsection
shall be guilty of a Class IIIA misdemeanor, and the dog shall be treated
as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Except as provided in section 54-622.01,
if a dangerous dog of an owner with a prior conviction under sections
54-617 to 54-624 attacks or bites a human being or domestic animal, the owner
shall be guilty of a Class IIIA misdemeanor. In addition, the dangerous dog
shall be immediately confiscated by an animal control authority, placed in
quarantine for the proper length of time, and thereafter destroyed in an expeditious
and humane manner.

Laws 1989, LB 208, § 7;

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 20;

Laws 2009, LB494, § 11.